New York, session 2025-2026, S9593.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "stop high- 2 way community harm act". 3 § 2. The legislature finds that parts of the I-95 expressway, partic- 4 ularly the Cross Bronx Expressway, were borne out of a history of racist 5 urban planning led by Robert Moses. The Cross Bronx Expressway is 6 already one of the nation's most toxic, congested roadways, long associ- 7 ated with racial health disparities like childhood asthma and heart 8 disease in surrounding communities. Its initial construction decimated 9 Black and Brown neighborhoods along the corridor while adding signif- 10 icant highway runoff pollution to the Bronx River and Harlem River, and 11 contributing to some of the highest rates of asthma and heart disease in 12 the country. According to a department of transportation study, idling 13 cars on the Cross Bronx Expressway that have polluted the borough for 14 decades drive chronic health issues, including Asthma, among Bronx resi- 15 dents. 16 The legislature further finds that historic transportation planning 17 decisions have disproportionately sited highways in and adjacent to 18 public housing and other environmental justice communities, resulting in 19 cumulative health and environmental harms. Preventing additional highway 20 expansion in close proximity to such developments is necessary to reduce 21 inequities, protect public health, and ensure that state actions do not 22 perpetuate disproportionate impacts on vulnerable populations. 23 The legislature further finds that expansion of highway capacity in or 24 near environmental justice communities, including public housing devel- 25 opments and areas with elevated asthma rates, has contributed to adverse 26 public health, safety, and environmental outcomes. It is therefore the 27 intent of the legislature to prohibit such expansions except in limited 28 circumstances where a demonstrated and evidence-based safety need cannot EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15224-04-6 S. 9593 2 1 be addressed through alternatives consistent with the state's complete 2 streets policy. 3 § 3. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 10-h to read 4 as follows: 5 § 10-h. Limitations on highway capacity expansion in sensitive areas. 6 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 7 following meanings: 8 (a) "Environmental justice" shall have the same meaning as defined in 9 section 48-0103 of the environmental conservation law. 10 (b) "Environmental justice community" shall be defined by the depart- 11 ment of environmental conservation and shall include, but not be limited 12 to, communities bearing disproportionate pollution and climate change 13 burdens which may be due to the race, color, religion, national origin 14 or income levels of the members of such community. 15 (c) "Public housing development" shall mean any housing operated by 16 the state, a municipality, or a municipal housing authority established 17 under the public housing law. 18 (d) "Increase in vehicular lane capacity" shall mean any project that 19 increases the number of general purpose travel lanes or otherwise 20 increases the ability of a roadway to carry additional motor vehicle 21 traffic, including but not limited to: 22 (i) the addition of new travel lanes; 23 (ii) the conversion of shoulders, medians, or auxiliary lanes into 24 travel lanes, whether temporary or permanent; 25 (iii) the widening or modifying of shoulders or travel lanes where 26 such widening or modifying facilitates increased vehicle throughput, 27 operating speeds, or future lane conversion; and 28 (iv) any design change demonstrated, through accepted transportation 29 modeling or comparable project data, to increase vehicle miles traveled. 30 2. The commissioner shall not approve nor shall the state fund or 31 undertake any projects involving a highway if such project includes the 32 increase in vehicular lane capacity of such highway where an increase in 33 vehicular lane capacity would occur within: 34 (a) two hundred feet of a public housing development; 35 (b) a zip code with a three-year average asthma emergency department 36 incidence rate per ten thousand persons of greater than seventy accord- 37 ing to the department of health; or 38 (c) an environmental justice community. 39 3. The commissioner may waive the provisions of subdivision two of 40 this section for a project only after: 41 (a) not less than sixty days prior to making any determination, 42 preparing and publicly publishing a safety and alternatives analysis 43 which shall include, but not be limited to: 44 (i) a determination if the project is consistent with section three 45 hundred thirty-one of this chapter and all federal highway safety 46 requirements; 47 (ii) an analysis of not fewer than five years of crash data, including 48 fatalities, serious injuries, and impacts to pedestrians, cyclists, and 49 transit users; 50 (iii) an evaluation of all reasonable alternatives that do not 51 increase vehicular lane capacity, including but not limited to roadway 52 redesign, speed management, signal improvements, and transit enhance- 53 ments; 54 (iv) an assessment of induced demand and impacts on vehicle miles 55 traveled; S. 9593 3 1 (v) an evaluation of the impacts on air quality and public health, 2 including but not limited to asthma-related outcomes; and 3 (vi) an assessment of impacts on environmental justice communities. 4 (b) publicly publishing a report finding that: 5 (i) there is a specific and documented roadway safety hazard; 6 (ii) such hazard cannot be addressed through measures consistent with 7 section three hundred thirty-one of this chapter; and 8 (iii) the project is necessary to achieve a measurable reduction in 9 fatalities or serious injuries. 10 (c) providing for a public comment period of not less than forty-five 11 days with at least one public hearing occurring in the affected area. 12 4. No waiver shall be issued or approved under subdivision three of 13 this section where the project involves the widening or modification of 14 highway shoulders, unless: 15 (a) such project is limited to providing emergency access, disabled 16 vehicle refuge, or safety improvements for vulnerable users; 17 (b) such shoulder is not designated or operated as a general purpose 18 travel lane at any time; and 19 (c) the department demonstrates that such project will not increase 20 vehicle speeds, traffic volumes, or localized air pollution. 21 5. The department shall monitor safety outcomes for a period of not 22 less than three years following completion of any project approved 23 pursuant to subdivision three of this section and shall publish such 24 findings publicly. 25 6. The commissioner shall apply a clear and convincing evidentiary 26 standard when making determinations under this section. 27 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.